src/fst/orthography/spellrelax.regex
# Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
# http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
# this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Plains Cree long vowel variation.

# short-i elision
i (->) [ %' | ‘ | ’ ],

â (->) {ā}, # a + combining macron U+0304
ê (->) {ē}, # e + combining macron U+0304
î (->) {ī}, # i + combining macron U+0304
ô (->) {ō}, # o + combining macron U+0304

â (->) ā, # a macron
ê (->) ē, # e macron
î (->) ī, # i macron
ô (->) ō, # o macron

â (->) {â}, # a + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ê (->) {ê}, # e + combining circumflex accent U+0302
î (->) {î}, # i + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ô (->) {ô}, # o + combining circumflex accent U+0302

# Long vowel markings are frequently dropped:

â (->) a,
ê (->) e,
î (->) i,
ô (->) o,

# NS 152 materials consistantly write some vowels as long where Arok's write
# them as short.
# E.G. NS 152 give 'askîy' but Arok gives 'askiy' according to SRO standard.
a (->) â,
i (->) î,
o (->) ô,,

# Prefix-final vowel (preceded by consonant) dropped before following morpheme
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ]  (->) 0 || [ c | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y ] _ %- ,,

# Sandhi at prefix boundaries
# %- -> 0 ,
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ a | â ] (->) [ a | â ] , 
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- ê (->) [ e | ê ] , 
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ i | î ] (->) [ i | î ] , 
[ a | â | ê | i | î | o | ô ] %- [ o | ô ] (->) [ o | ô ] , 

# Dealing with spaces instead of hyphens as separators in multipart words

[ %- ] (->) [ %- ]+,  # Multiple hyphens into a single hyphen
! [ "@U.joiner.NULL@" %- ] (->) 0, # Missing hyphens between prefixes/preverbs
%- (->) [ %  | %  | %  ]+, # Multiple non-breaking or standard spaces SPACE + NBSP + NNBSP (in syllabics) to single hyphen

# Dealing with English-influenced divergences from SRO, and misspellings based on modern pronunciation

# Vowels
[ i | î ] (->) {ee},
[ a | â ] (->) u,
ê (->) [ {ay} | {eh} ],

# Consonants
k (->) g,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added (including <c> overgenerates)
p (->) b,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
t (->) d,   # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops, maybe context should be added
c (->) j,   # English influence on spelling <c>

# Glides
# e.g., "tanisi ê-isiyihkâsoyan -> "tan'si ê-sikâsowan"
# TODO: figure out what conditions this (probably /o/ or /i/)
# These rules without context are EXCESSIVELY productive!
# y (->) w,
# w (->) y,

# Proto-Algonquian dialectal /y/
y (->) ý,

{iw} (->) {ow},     # Misspelling based on assimilated pronunciation of underlying /i/ as /o/ before /w/
{ow} (->) {iw},
{êyiht} (->) {êht},
{êyiht} (->) {êt},
{êyim} (->) {êm},
{iyi} (->) [ î | i ],       # Mishearing of vowel-glide-vowel cluster
{nwa} (->) {no},    # <nwa> is likely to be heard as <no>

c (->) {ch},        # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {tch},       # English influence on spelling <c>
c (->) {ts} ,,      # Another English influence on spelling <c>

[..] (->) h || _ .#. ,, # Excessive word-final pre-aspiration
   h (->) 0 || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t | g | b | d ],,    # Missing preaspiration before stops
[..] (->) h || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ c | k | p | t | g | b | d ],,  # Excessive preaspiration before stops

# Standardizing double-vowel notation for long vowels
â (->) {aa},
î (->) {ii},
ô (->) {oo},

# Standardizing rarer SRO marking of long vowels with accent-aigu
[ a | â ] (->) á,
ê (->) é,
[ i | î ] (->) í,
[ o | ô ] (->) ó,

# Woods Cree to Plains Cree
[ ý | y ] (->) {th} ,,
ê (->) [ î | i ] ,,

# Adding missing or reduced short i's in interconsonantal contexts
i (->) [..] || [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | b | g | d ] _ [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t | w | y | b | g | d ] # ,,

# Removing morpheme boundary markers (middle-dots)
# [..] (->) {·}

;


# Format/explanation:
# lexical side (->) input
# Or, in other words:
# correct (->) in use out there
